Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2450.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 74.08A.120 and 2020 c 136 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department may establish a state food assistance program for ((legal immigrants and victims of human trafficking as defined in RCW 74.04.005 who are ineligible for the federal food stamp program.(2) The rules for the state food assistance program shall follow exactly the rules of the federal food stamp program except for the provisions pertaining to immigrant status.(3)))persons meeting the criteria in subsection (2) of this section. The rules for the state food assistance program shall follow exactly the rules of the federal food stamp program except for the provisions pertaining to immigrant status and the exemptions to work requirements as provided in this section. No person who is receiving benefits from the federal food stamp program may simultaneously receive state food assistance program benefits.(2) A person is eligible for the state food assistance program when they meet either of the following criteria:(a) The person is a legal immigrant or victim of human trafficking as defined in RCW 74.04.005 who is ineligible for the federal food stamp program only because of their alien status; or(b) The person:(i) Was disqualified from the federal food stamp program solely because of nonparticipation in the work requirements for able-bodied adults without dependents;(ii) Does not qualify for an exemption from the federal food stamp program work requirements, and:(iii)(A) Is homeless;(B) Is age 24 or younger, and:(I) Was in foster care at the time of their 18th birthday; or(II) Has received extended foster care services as defined in RCWÂ  74.13.020;(C) Is a veteran;(D) Is age 55 or older; or(E) Is an adult in a basic food assistance unit that has a family member who is under the age of 18.(3) Benefits under the state food assistance program for persons meeting the criteria in subsection (2)(b) of this section, and who do not meet the criteria under subsection (2)(a) of this section, are limited to the portion of the state's 36-month work requirement time limit period for able-bodied adults without dependents that remains following disqualification from the federal food stamp program, and are not available during any period of time that the person has regained eligibility for the federal food stamp program.(4) A person is not required to meet work requirements to receive state food assistance program benefits if the person:(a) Meets the criteria in subsection (2)(a) of this section and one or more of the criteria in subsection (2)(b)(iii) of this section; or(b) Meets the criteria in subsection (2)(b) of this section.(5) The department shall adopt rules creating exemptions to the work requirements for the categories identified in subsection (2)(b)(iii) of this section in accordance with subsections (3) and (4) of this section.(6) The benefit under the state food assistance program shall be established by the legislature in the biennial operating budget.(((4)))(7) The department may enter into a contract with the United States department of agriculture to use the existing federal food stamp program coupon system for the purposes of administering the state food assistance program.(((5)))(8) In the event the department is unable to enter into a contract with the United States department of agriculture, the department may issue vouchers to eligible households for the purchase of eligible foods at participating retailers.(9) For purposes of this section:(a) "Homeless" means an individual who:(i) Does not have or will imminently lose their nighttime residence; or(ii) Stays primarily in a:(A) Supervised shelter that provides temporary living or sleeping quarters;(B) Halfway house that provides a temporary residence for persons going into or coming out of an institution;(C) Residence of another person that is temporary and the individual receiving or seeking benefits has lived there for 90 days or less; or(D) Place not usually used as sleeping quarters for humans.(b) "Veteran" means as an individual who, regardless of the conditions of their discharge or release from, served in the United States armed forces, including an individual who served in a reserve component of the armed forces, or served as a commissioned officer of the public health service, the environmental science services administration, or the national oceanic and atmospheric administration.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---